Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.100

Investigations—Statements—Publication of information.

The director in the director's discretion:

(1) May make such public or private investigations, within or without the state, as the director finds necessary or appropriate to determine whether any person has violated, or is about to violate, any provision of this chapter or any rule or order of the director or to aid in enforcement of this chapter;

(2) May require or permit any person to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise as the director may determine; and

(3) May publish information concerning any violation of this chapter or any rule or order under this chapter.

[ 1986 c 14 s 10.]